Washington statutes.
RCW 36.26.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "County commissioners" or "board of county commissioners" means and includes:

(a) Any single board of county commissioners, county council, or other governing body of any county which has neither a board of county commissioners nor a county council denominated as such; and

(b) The governing bodies, including any combination or mixture of more than one board of county commissioners, county council, or otherwise denominated governing body of a county, of any two or more contiguous counties electing to participate jointly in the support of any intercounty public defender.

(2) "District" or "public defender district" means any one or more entire counties electing to employ a public defender; and no county shall be divided in the creation of any public defender district.

[ 1969 c 94 s 1.]